Utah statutes.
58-37-12.   Enforcement -- Coordination and cooperation of federal and state agencies -- Powers.

The department and all law enforcement agencies charged with enforcing this act shall cooperate with federal and other state agencies in discharging their responsibilities concerning traffic in controlled substances and in suppressing the abuse of controlled substances.  To this end, they are authorized to:

(1)  Arrange for the exchange of information between governmental officials concerning the use and abuse of dangerous substances.

(2)  Coordinate and cooperate in training programs in controlled substance law enforcement at the local and state levels.

(3)  Cooperate with the United States Department of Justice and the Utah Department of Public Safety by establishing a centralized unit which will receive, catalog, file, and collect statistics, including records of drug-dependent persons and other controlled substance law offenders within the state, and make the information available for federal, state, and local law enforcement purposes.

(4)  Conduct programs of eradication aimed at destroying the wild or illicit growth of plant species from which controlled substances may be extracted.



Amended by Chapter 64, 1997 General Session

